California, session 20252026, SB727.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 93004 of the Government Code is amended to read:93004. For purposes of this title, the following definitions apply:(a) “Agency” means the Great Redwood Trail Agency.(b) “Board” or “board of directors” means the board of directors of the agency appointed pursuant to Section 93011.(c) “Dividing line” means the county line separating the Counties of Mendocino and Sonoma at or near mile post 89.SEC. 2. Section 93004.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:93004.5. The agency is a subdivision of the state.SEC. 3. Section 93011 of the Government Code is amended to read:93011. (a) The agency shall be governed by a board of directors, composed as follows:(1) Two persons appointed by each of the boards of supervisors of the Counties of Humboldt, Marin, Mendocino, and Sonoma.(2) A city representative, selected by the cities served by the rail line. The representative shall be selected by the cities through a process adopted by a resolution of the board.(3) The Governor may appoint a nonvoting director from the Transportation Agency and a nonvoting director from the Natural Resources Agency.(b) All directors, except the nonvoting directors, shall serve for terms of two years and until their successors have qualified.(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, including the common law doctrine that precludes the simultaneous holding of incompatible offices, a local government officer or a member of a state commission may be appointed and may serve as a member of the agency’s board of directors if the person also meets the other applicable qualifications of this title.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, including the common law doctrine that precludes the simultaneous holding of incompatible offices, a member of the agency’s board of directors may also serve as a local government officer or a member of a state commission.SEC. 4. Section 93021 of the Government Code is amended to read:93021. (a) The agency may acquire, own, lease, and operate railroad lines and equipment, including, but not limited to, real and personal property, tracks, rights-of-way, equipment, and facilities, to further the purposes of this title.(b) Any railroad track and tie owned by the agency that remains in place within a right-of-way railbanked pursuant to Section 93022 shall not be deemed “waste” for purposes of Section 25124 of the Health and Safety Code if the right-of-way remains railbanked or is otherwise within the ongoing jurisdiction of the federal Surface Transportation Board or successor agency.SEC. 5. Section 93023 is added to the Government Code, to read:93023. Article 5 (commencing with Section 53090) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 shall not apply to the agency, except with respect to the development of any projects on properties that are not owned or directly controlled by the agency.SEC. 6. Section 93024 of the Government Code is amended to read:93024. The agency shall have and may exercise all rights and powers, expressed or implied, necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this title, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(a) To enter into and perform all necessary contracts. Any public works contract, as defined in Section 1101 of the Public Contract Code, shall be let pursuant to Section 93029.(b) To fix and collect fees for the use of any land owned or controlled, or for any service provided, by the agency. This subdivision does not authorize the agency to fix or collect a fee for public access to the land owned or controlled by the agency.(c) To make grants.(d) To acquire any real or personal property within or outside the agency, to hold, manage, occupy, dispose of, convey and encumber the property, and to create a leasehold interest in the property for the benefit of the agency.(e) To lease, rent, sell, exchange, or transfer interests in real property if doing so is both consistent with the potential full restoration of railroad use upon an order of the federal Surface Transportation Board without cost to the agency, and would not interfere with the continuous use of the rail rights-of-way pursuant to trail standards recommended by the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials.(f) To undertake or fund projects and programs implementing this title or relating to the rail rights-of-way.(g) To provide for the management of the rail rights-of-way.(h) To apply for and accept grants, gifts, donations of money and property, subventions, rents, royalties, or other assistance from public or private sources.(i) To recruit and coordinate volunteers and experts to conduct interpretive and recreational programs, and to assist with construction projects and the maintenance of facilities.(j) To enter into contracts and joint powers agreements pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1).(k) To sue and be sued. (l) To contract with the State Coastal Conservancy, a state agency, or another organization to staff the agency. A state agency may contract with, and provide services to, the agency consistent with Section 11256. Upon a state agency contracting with the agency, the state agency may contract for professional services on behalf of the agency pursuant to Section 4526 and the state agency’s regulations.(m) To receive funds from the State Coastal Conservancy or any other state agency as may be appropriated by the Legislature.(n) To hire and appoint necessary employees, to define their qualifications and duties, and to provide a schedule of compensation for performance of their duties.(o) To engage counsel and other professional services.(p) To borrow money, give security therefor, and purchase on contract.(q) To adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.(r) To adopt ordinances following the procedures of Article 7 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3.(s) To adopt and enforce rules and regulations for the administration, operation, use, and maintenance of trails, excursion rail service, and other recreational facilities and programs implemented pursuant to this title.(t) To contract with state law enforcement agencies, or local law enforcement agencies of jurisdictions within the service area of the agency, to enforce the adopted rules, regulations, and ordinances of the agency.(u) To provide insurance pursuant to Part 6 (commencing with Section 989) of Division 3.6 of Title 1.SEC. 7. Section 93024.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:93024.5. Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 54221, the use of agency real property by third parties via lease, license agreement, or concession agreement for uses ancillary to the operation or maintenance of a trail pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 93022, as consistent with a master plan adopted pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 93022, such as the operation of campgrounds, parking facilities, sale or rental of recreational supplies or services, food or beverage service, storage, or educational or cultural purposes, shall be deemed an “agency’s use” for purposes of Section 54221, regardless of whether such use is commercial in nature.SEC. 8. Section 93025 of the Government Code is amended to read:93025. Notwithstanding Section 93004.5, the state is not liable for any contracts, debts, or other obligations of the North Coast Railroad Authority, its predecessor in interest, or the agency.SEC. 9. Section 93027 of the Government Code is amended to read:93027. On or before July 1, 2022, the agency shall hire or contract for professional staff necessary to fulfill the requirements of this title, including by exercising its authority pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 93024. This subdivision does not limit the authority granted elsewhere in this title.SEC. 10. Section 93028 is added to the Government Code, to read:93028. (a) At the direction of the board, the executive director shall submit a recommended budget to the board on or before June 30 of each year. The board shall adopt an annual budget by a resolution adopted by a majority of the board of directors.(b) The board shall not make any increase or addition to the annual budget after it adopts the budget pursuant to subdivision (a) unless that action is approved by a resolution adopted by at least two-thirds of the board members.(c) In the recommended and adopted budgets, and in any revisions to the adopted budget, the funding sources shall equal the financing uses.(d) The board shall provide for regular audits of the agency’s accounts and records and shall maintain accounting records and report accounting transactions in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles adopted by the Government Accounting Standards Board of the Financial Accounting Foundation for public reporting purposes.SEC. 11. Section 93029 is added to the Government Code, to read:93029. (a) For purposes of this section, “work” means the erection, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any public structure, building, road, or other public improvement of any kind.(b) For any work done by agency personnel, the estimated cost of the work shall not exceed an amount equal to the threshold set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 22032 of the Public Contract Code, except under the following circumstances:(1) The work consists of environmental preservation or habitat management.(2) The work consists of maintenance work as defined in Section 22002 of the Public Contract Code.(3) The work consists of emergency work.(c) With the approval of the board, and in accordance with a board policy that has been adopted in an open meeting, any work not performed by agency personnel and estimated by the engineer to cost in excess of an amount equal to the threshold set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 22032 of the Public Contract Code shall be done by contract and shall comply with the following formal competitive bidding process:(1) All contracts shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this section. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit for the whole of the work, or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the agency.(2) The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by posting the notice on applicable internet websites, as appropriate, or by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the service area of the agency inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the work before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit for the whole of the work, or shall be divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the agency.(3) The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to that title.(4) The board may reject any bid. If all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or the work consists of maintenance work, environmental preservation or habitat management, or emergency work, the board may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account.(d) In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts for work will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.SEC. 12. Section 105088 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:105088. (a) Upon receiving the Great Redwood Trail Agency’s rights, privileges, and interests relating to the agency’s rail right-of-way south of the dividing line pursuant to Section 93030 of the Government Code, the district shall designate a single point of contact for the agency.(b) The district may partner or contract with trail agencies, including the Great Redwood Trail Agency, on creation and maintenance of the bicycle and pedestrian pathways under the district’s jurisdiction.(c) The ancillary bicycle and pedestrian pathways that provide connections between and access to district station sites and the district’s other pathways shall be known as “The Great Redwood Trail, Southern Segment.”(d) The planned bike and pedestrian pathway running from the district’s station in the City of Larkspur to the northern terminus of the Golden Gate Bridge in the County of Marin shall be known as the Great Redwood Trail. The facilities described in this subdivision are not the property of the Great Redwood Trail Agency and are not subject to, or within the scope of, the environmental impact report for the Great Redwood Trail, Southern Segment or the Great Redwood Trail within the jurisdiction of the Great Redwood Trail Agency.SEC. 13. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.